California statutes. Civil Code
(6) “Profiling” means any form of automated processing of personal information that uses personal information to evaluate certain aspects relating to a natural person, including analyzing or predicting aspects concerning a natural person’s performance at work, economic situation, health, personal preferences, interests, reliability, behavior, location, or movements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 2273)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.31.

(a) A business that provides an online service, product, or feature likely to be accessed by children shall take all of the following actions:

(1) (A) Before any new online services, products, or features are offered to the public, complete a Data Protection Impact Assessment for any online service, product, or feature likely to be accessed by children and maintain documentation of this assessment as long as the online service, product, or feature is likely to be accessed by children. A business shall biennially review all Data Protection Impact Assessments.

(B) The Data Protection Impact Assessment
 required by this paragraph shall identify the purpose of the online service, product, or feature, how it uses children’s personal information, and the risks of material detriment to children that arise from the data management practices of the business. The Data Protection Impact Assessment shall address, to the extent applicable, all of the following:

(i) Whether the design of the online product, service, or feature could harm children, including by exposing children to harmful, or potentially harmful, content on the online product, service, or feature.

(ii) Whether the design of the online product, service, or feature could lead to children experiencing or being targeted by harmful, or potentially harmful, contacts on the online product, service, or feature.

(iii) Whether the design of the online product, service, or feature could permit children to witness, participate in, or be subject to
 harmful, or potentially harmful, conduct on the online product, service, or feature.

(iv) Whether the design of the online product, service, or feature could allow children to be party to or exploited by a harmful, or potentially harmful, contact on the online product, service, or feature.

(v) Whether algorithms used by the online product, service, or feature could harm children.

(vi) Whether targeted advertising systems used by the online product, service, or feature could harm children.

(vii) Whether and how the online product, service, or feature uses system design features to increase, sustain, or extend use of the online product,
 service, or feature by children, including the automatic playing of media, rewards for time spent, and
 notifications.

(viii) Whether, how, and for what purpose the online product, service, or feature collects or processes sensitive personal information of children.

(2) Document any risk of material detriment to children that arises from the data management practices of the business identified in the Data Protection Impact Assessment required by paragraph (1) and create a timed plan to mitigate or eliminate the risk before the online service, product, or feature is accessed by children.

(3) Within three business days of a written request by the Attorney General, provide to the Attorney General a list of all Data Protection Impact Assessments the business has completed.

(4) (A) For any Data Protection Impact Assessment completed
 pursuant to paragraph (1), make the Data Protection Impact Assessment available, within five business days, to the Attorney General pursuant to a written request.

(B) Notwithstanding any other law, a Data Protection Impact Assessment is protected as confidential and shall be exempt from public disclosure, including under the California Public Records Act
 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(C) To the extent any information contained in a Data Protection Impact Assessment disclosed to the Attorney General includes information subject to attorney-client privilege or work product protection, disclosure pursuant to this paragraph shall not constitute a waiver of that privilege or protection.

(5) Estimate the age of child users with a reasonable level of certainty appropriate to the risks that arise from the data management practices of the business or apply the privacy and data protections afforded to children to all consumers.

(6) Configure all default privacy settings provided to children by the online service,
 product, or feature to settings that offer a high level of privacy, unless the business can demonstrate a compelling reason that a different setting is in the best interests of children.

(7) Provide any privacy information, terms of service, policies, and community standards concisely, prominently, and using clear language suited to the age of children likely to access that online service, product, or feature.

(8) If the online service, product, or feature allows the child’s parent, guardian, or any other consumer to monitor the child’s online activity or track the child’s location, provide an obvious signal to the child when the child is being monitored or tracked.

(9) Enforce published terms, policies, and community
 standards established by the business, including, but not limited to, privacy policies and those concerning children.

(10) Provide prominent, accessible, and responsive tools to help children, or if applicable their parents or guardians, exercise their privacy rights and report concerns.

(b) A business that provides an online service, product, or feature likely to be accessed by children shall not take any of the following actions:

(1) Use the personal information of any child in a way that the business knows, or has reason to know, is materially detrimental to the physical health, mental health, or well-being of a child.

(2) Profile a child by default
 unless both of the following criteria are met:

(A) The business can demonstrate it has appropriate safeguards in place to protect children.

(B) Either of the following is true:

(i) Profiling is necessary to provide the online service, product, or feature requested and only with respect to the aspects of the online service, product, or feature with which the child is actively and knowingly engaged.

(ii) The business can demonstrate a compelling reason that profiling is in the best interests of children.

(3) Collect, sell, share, or retain any personal information that is not necessary to provide an
 online service, product, or feature with which a child is actively and knowingly engaged, or as described in subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.145, unless the business can demonstrate a compelling reason that the collecting, selling, sharing, or retaining of the personal information is in the best interests of children likely to access the online service, product, or feature.

(4) If the end user is a child, use personal information for any reason other than a reason for which that personal information was collected, unless the business can demonstrate a compelling reason that use of the personal information is in the best interests of children.

(5) Collect, sell, or share any precise geolocation information of
 children by default unless the collection of that precise geolocation information is strictly necessary for the business to provide the service, product, or feature requested and then only for the limited time that the collection of precise geolocation information is necessary to provide the service, product, or feature.

(6) Collect any precise geolocation information of a child without providing an obvious sign to the child for the duration of that collection that precise geolocation information is being collected.

(7) Use dark patterns to lead or encourage children to provide personal information beyond what is reasonably expected to provide that online service, product, or feature to forego privacy protections, or to take any action that the business knows, or has reason
 to know, is materially detrimental to the child’s physical health, mental health, or well-being.

(8) Use any personal information collected to estimate age or age range for any other purpose or retain that personal information longer than necessary to estimate age. Age assurance shall be proportionate to the risks and data practice of an online service, product, or feature.

(c) (1) A Data Protection Impact Assessment conducted by a business for the purpose of compliance with any other law complies with this section if the Data Protection Impact Assessment meets the requirements of this title.

(2) A single data protection impact assessment may contain multiple similar processing operations that present similar
 risks only if each relevant online service, product, or feature is addressed.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 80, Sec. 21.   (SB 1525)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.32.

(a) The California Children’s Data Protection Working Group is hereby created within the Office of the Attorney General to deliver a report to the Legislature, pursuant to subdivision (e), regarding best practices for the implementation of this title.

(b) Working group members shall consist of Californians with expertise in at least two of the following areas:

(1) Children’s data privacy.

(2) Physical health.

(3) Mental health and well-being.

(4) Computer science.

(5) Children’s rights.

(c) The working group shall select a chair and a vice chair from among its members and shall consist of the following nine members:

(1) Two appointees by the Governor.

(2) Two appointees by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

(3) Two appointees by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(4) Two appointees by the Attorney General.

(5) One appointee by the California Privacy Protection Agency.

(d) The working group shall take input from a broad range of stakeholders, including from academia, consumer advocacy groups, and small, medium, and large businesses affected by data privacy policies and shall make recommendations to the Legislature on best practices regarding, at minimum, all of the following:

(1) Identifying online
 services, products, or features likely to be accessed by children.

(2) Evaluating and prioritizing the best interests of children with respect to their privacy, physical health, and mental health and well-being and evaluating how those interests may be furthered by the design, development, and implementation of an online service, product, or feature.

(3) Ensuring that age assurance methods used by businesses that provide online services, products, or features likely to be accessed by children are proportionate to the risks that arise from the data management practices of the business, privacy protective, and minimally invasive.

(4) Assessing and mitigating risks to children that arise from the use of an online service, product, or feature.

(5) Publishing privacy information, policies, and standards in concise, clear language suited for the age of children likely to access an online service, product, or feature.

(6) How the working group and the Department of Justice may leverage the substantial and growing expertise of the California Privacy Protection Agency in the long-term development of data privacy policies that affect the privacy, rights, and safety of children online.

(e) On or before
 July 1, 2024, and every two years thereafter, the working group shall submit, pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code, a report to the Legislature regarding the recommendations described in subdivision (d).

(f) A meeting of the members of the working group may be conducted, in whole or in part, by electronic transmission, electronic video screen communication, conference telephone, or other means of remote communication.

(g) The members of the working group shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for all necessary expenses actually incurred in the performance of their duties.

(h) This section shall remain in effect until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 45, Sec. 1.   (AB 127)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.33.

(a) A business shall complete a Data Protection Impact Assessment on or before July 1, 2024, for any online service, product, or feature likely to be accessed by children offered to the public before July 1, 2024.

(b) This section does not apply to an online service, product, or feature that is not offered to the public on or after July 1, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 2273)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.35.

(a) Any business that violates this title shall be subject to an injunction and liable for a civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) per affected child for each negligent violation or not more than seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500) per affected child for each intentional violation, which shall be assessed and recovered only in a civil action brought in the name of the people of the State of California by the Attorney General.

(b) Any penalties, fees, and expenses recovered in an action brought under this title shall be deposited in the Consumer Privacy Fund, created within the General Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1798.160, with the intent that they be used to fully offset costs
 incurred by the Attorney General in connection with this title.

(c) (1) If a business is in substantial compliance with the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.99.31, the Attorney General shall provide written notice to the business, before initiating an action under this title, identifying the specific provisions of this title that the Attorney General alleges have been or are being violated.

(2) If, within 90 days of the notice required by this subdivision, the business cures any noticed violation and provides the Attorney General a written statement that the alleged violations have been cured, and sufficient measures have been taken to prevent future violations, the business shall not be liable for a civil penalty for any violation cured pursuant to this subdivision.

(d) Nothing in this title shall be interpreted to serve as the basis for a private right of action under this title or any other law.

(e) The Attorney General may solicit broad public participation and adopt regulations to clarify the requirements of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 2273)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.40.

This title does not apply to the information or entities described in subdivision (c) of Section 1798.145.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 320, Sec. 2.   (AB 2273)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.48. Data Broker Registration [1798.99.80. - 1798.99.89.]

1798.99.80.

For purposes of this title:

(a) The definitions in Section 1798.140 shall apply unless otherwise specified in this title.

(b) “Authorized agent” has the same meaning as used in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division 6 of Title 11 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) “Data broker” means a business that knowingly collects and sells to third parties the personal information of a consumer with whom the business does not have a direct relationship. “Data broker” does not include any of the following:

(1) An entity to the extent that it is covered by the federal Fair Credit
 Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(2) An entity to the extent that it is covered by the Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (Public Law 106-102) and implementing regulations.

(3) An entity to the extent that it is covered by the Insurance Information and Privacy Protection Act (Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code).

(4) An entity, or a business associate of a covered entity, to the extent their processing of personal information is exempt under Section 1798.146. For purposes of this paragraph, “business associate” and “covered entity” have the same meanings as defined in Section 1798.146.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 709, Sec. 1.   (SB 362)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.81.

A fund to be known as the “Data Brokers’ Registry Fund” is hereby created within the State Treasury. The fund shall be administered by the California Privacy Protection Agency. All moneys collected or received by the California Privacy Protection Agency and the Department of Justice under this title shall be deposited into the Data Brokers’ Registry Fund, to be available for expenditure by the California Privacy Protection Agency, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to offset all of the following costs:

(a) The reasonable costs of establishing and maintaining the informational internet website described in Section 1798.99.84.

(b) The costs incurred by the state courts and the California Privacy Protection Agency in
 connection with enforcing this title, as specified in Section 1798.99.82.

(c) The reasonable costs of establishing, maintaining, and providing access to the accessible deletion mechanism described in Section 1798.99.86.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 709, Sec. 2.   (SB 362)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.82.

(a) On or before January 31 following each year in which a business meets the definition of data broker as provided in this title, the business shall register with the California Privacy Protection Agency pursuant to the requirements of this section.

(b) In registering with the California Privacy Protection Agency, as described in subdivision (a), a data broker shall do all of the following:

(1) Pay a registration fee in an amount determined by the California Privacy Protection Agency, not to exceed the reasonable costs of establishing and maintaining the informational internet website described in Section 1798.99.84 and the reasonable costs of establishing, maintaining, and providing access to
 the accessible deletion mechanism described in Section 1798.99.86. Registration fees shall be deposited in the Data Brokers’ Registry Fund, created within the State Treasury pursuant to Section 1798.99.81, and used for the purposes outlined in this paragraph.

(2) Provide the following information:

(A) The name of the data broker and its primary physical, email, and internet website addresses.

(B) The metrics compiled pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.99.85.

(C) Whether the data broker collects the personal information of minors.

(D) Whether the data broker collects consumers’ names, dates of birth, ZIP Codes, email addresses, or phone numbers.

(E) Whether the data broker collects consumers’ account login or account number in combination with any required security code, access code, or password that would permit access to a consumer’s account with a third party.

(F) Whether the data broker collects consumers’ drivers’ license number, California identification card number, tax identification number, social security number, passport number, military identification number, or other unique identification number issued on a government document commonly used to verify the identity of a specific individual.

(G) Whether the data broker collects consumers’ mobile advertising identification numbers, connected television identification numbers, or vehicle identification numbers (VIN).

(H) Whether the data
 broker collects consumers’ citizenship data, including immigration status.

(I) Whether the data broker collects consumers’ union membership status.

(J) Whether the data broker collects consumers’ sexual orientation status.

(K) Whether the data broker collects consumers’ gender identity and gender expression data. 

(L) Whether the data broker collects consumers’ biometric data. 

(M) Whether the data broker collects consumers’ precise geolocation.

(N) Whether the data broker collects consumers’ reproductive health care data.

(O) Whether the data broker has shared
 or sold consumers’ data to a foreign actor in the past year.

(P) Whether the data broker has shared or sold consumers’ data to the federal government in the past year.

(Q) Whether the data broker has shared or sold consumers’ data to other state governments in the past year.

(R) Whether the data broker has shared or sold consumers’ data to law enforcement in the past year, unless that data was shared pursuant to a subpoena or court order.

(S) Whether the data broker has shared or sold consumers’ data to a developer of a GenAI system or model in the past year.

(T) Up to three, but no fewer than one, of the most common types of personal information that the data broker collects, if the data
 broker does not collect the information described in subparagraphs (D) and (G).

(U) Beginning January 1, 2029, whether the data broker has undergone an audit as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.99.86, and, if so, the most recent year that the data broker has submitted a report resulting from the audit and any related materials to the California Privacy Protection Agency.

(V) A link to a page on the data broker’s internet website that does both of the following:

(i) Details how consumers may exercise their privacy rights by doing all of the following:

(I) Deleting personal information, as described in Section 1798.105.

(II) Correcting inaccurate personal information, as
 described in Section 1798.106.

(III) Learning what personal information is being collected and how to access that personal information, as described in Section 1798.110.

(IV) Learning what personal information is being sold or shared and to whom, as described in Section 1798.115.

(V) Learning how to opt out of the sale or sharing of personal information, as described in Section 1798.120.

(VI) Learning how to limit the use and disclosure of sensitive personal information, as described in Section 1798.121.

(ii) Does not make use of any dark patterns.

(W) Whether and to what extent the data broker or any of its subsidiaries is
 regulated by any of the following:

(i) The federal Fair Credit Reporting Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1681 et seq.).

(ii) The Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act (Public Law 106-102) and implementing regulations.

(iii) The Insurance Information and Privacy Protection Act (Article 6.6 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1 of the Insurance Code).

(iv) The Confidentiality of Medical Information Act (Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 56) of Division 1) or the privacy, security, and breach notification rules issued by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, Parts 160 and 164 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations, established pursuant to the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law
 104-191).

(X) Any additional information or explanation the data broker chooses to provide concerning its data collection practices.

(c) A data broker that fails to register as required by this section is liable for administrative fines and costs in an administrative action brought by the California Privacy Protection Agency as follows:

(1) An administrative fine of two hundred dollars ($200) for each day the data broker fails to register as required by this section.

(2) An amount equal to the fees that were due during the period it failed to register.

(3) Reasonable expenses incurred by the California Privacy Protection Agency in the investigation and administration of the action.

(d) A data broker required to register under this title that fails to comply with the requirements of Section 1798.99.86 is liable for administrative fines and costs in an administrative action brought by the California Privacy Protection Agency as follows:

(1) An administrative fine of two hundred dollars ($200) for each deletion request for each day the data broker fails to delete information as required by Section 1798.99.86.

(2) Reasonable expenses incurred by the California Privacy Protection Agency in the investigation and administration of the action.

(e) Any penalties, fines, fees, and expenses recovered in an action prosecuted under subdivision (c) or (d) shall be deposited in the Data Brokers’ Registry Fund, created within the State Treasury
 pursuant to Section 1798.99.81, with the intent that they be used to fully offset costs incurred by the state courts and the California Privacy Protection Agency in connection with this title.

(f) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) (A) “Foreign actor” means either of the following:

(i) The government of a foreign adversary country.

(ii) A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons organized under the laws of or having its principal place of business in a foreign adversary country.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), “foreign adversary country” has the same meaning as “covered nation” as
 defined in Section 4872 of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(2) “Developer of a GenAI system” means a business, person, partnership, corporation, or other entity that designs, codes, produces, or substantially modifies a GenAI system.

(3) “Generative artificial intelligence system” or “GenAI system” means an artificial intelligence that can generate derived synthetic content, including text, images, video, and audio, that emulates the structure and characteristics of the system’s training data.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (SB 361)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.84.

(a) The California Privacy Protection Agency shall create a page on its internet website where the registration information provided by data brokers described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1798.99.82, except as provided in subdivision (b), and the accessible deletion mechanism described in Section 1798.99.86 shall be accessible to the public.

(b) Information provided by a data broker pursuant to subparagraphs (D), (G), and (T) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1798.99.82 shall not be made accessible to the public on the California Privacy Protection Agency’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 466, Sec. 2.   (SB 361)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.85.

(a) On or before July 1 following each calendar year in which a business meets the definition of a data broker as provided in this title, the business shall do all of the following:

(1) Compile the number of requests pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1798.99.86 and Sections 1798.105, 1798.110, 1798.115, 1798.120, and 1798.121 that the data broker received, complied with in whole or in part, and denied during the previous calendar year.

(2) Compile the median and the mean number of days within which the data broker substantively responded to requests pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1798.99.86 and Sections 1798.105, 1798.110, 1798.115, 1798.120, and 1798.121 that the
 data broker received during the previous calendar year.

(3) Disclose the metrics compiled pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) within the data broker’s privacy policy posted on their internet website and accessible from a link included in the data broker’s privacy policy.

(b) In its disclosure pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) regarding requests made pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1798.99.86, a data broker shall disclose the number of requests that the data broker denied in whole or in part because of any of the following:

(1) The request was not verifiable.

(2) The request was not made by a consumer.

(3) The request called for information exempt from deletion.

(4) The request was denied on other grounds.

(c) In its disclosure pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), a data broker shall, for each provision of Section 1798.145 or 1798.146 under which deletion was not required, specify the number of requests in which deletion was not required in whole, or in part, under that provision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 709, Sec. 5.   (SB 362)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.86.

(a) By January 1, 2026, the California Privacy Protection Agency shall establish an accessible deletion mechanism that does all of the following:

(1) Implements and maintains reasonable security procedures and practices, including, but not limited to, administrative, physical, and technical safeguards appropriate to the nature of the information and the purposes for which the personal information will be used and to protect consumers’ personal information from unauthorized use, disclosure, access, destruction, or modification.

(2) Allows a consumer, through a single verifiable consumer request, to request that every data broker that maintains any personal information delete any personal
 information related to that consumer held by the data broker or associated service provider or contractor.

(3) Allows a consumer to selectively exclude specific data brokers from a request made under paragraph (2).

(4) Allows a consumer to make a request to alter a previous request made under this subdivision after at least 45 days have passed since the consumer last made a request under this subdivision.

(b) The accessible deletion mechanism established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall meet all of the following requirements:

(1) The accessible deletion mechanism shall allow a consumer to request the deletion of all personal information related to that consumer through a single deletion request.

(2) The accessible deletion mechanism shall permit a consumer to securely submit information in one or more privacy-protecting ways determined by the California Privacy Protection Agency to aid in the deletion request.

(3) The accessible deletion mechanism shall allow data brokers registered with the California Privacy Protection Agency to determine whether an individual has submitted a verifiable consumer request to delete the personal information related to that consumer as described in paragraph (1) and shall not allow the disclosure of any additional personal information when the data broker accesses the accessible deletion mechanism unless otherwise specified in this title.

(4) The accessible deletion mechanism shall allow a consumer to make a request described in paragraph (1) using an internet service operated by
 the California Privacy Protection Agency.

(5) The accessible deletion mechanism shall not charge a consumer to make a request described in paragraph (1).

(6) The accessible deletion mechanism shall allow a consumer to make a request described in paragraph (1) in any language spoken by any consumer for whom personal information has been collected by data brokers.

(7) The accessible deletion mechanism shall be readily accessible and usable by consumers with disabilities.

(8) The accessible deletion mechanism shall support the ability of a consumer’s authorized agents to aid in the deletion request.

(9) The accessible deletion mechanism shall allow the consumer, or their authorized agent, to
 verify the status of the consumer’s deletion request.

(10) The accessible deletion mechanism shall provide a description of all of the following:

(A) The deletion permitted by this section, including, but not limited to, the actions required by subdivisions (c) and (d).

(B) The process for submitting a deletion request pursuant to this section.

(C) Examples of the types of information that may be deleted.

(c) (1) Beginning August 1, 2026, a data broker shall access the accessible deletion mechanism established pursuant to subdivision (a) at least once every 45 days and do all of the following:

(A) Within
 45 days after receiving a request made pursuant to this section, process all deletion requests made pursuant to this section and delete all personal information related to the consumers making the requests consistent with the requirements of this section.

(B) In cases where a data broker denies a consumer request to delete under this title because the request cannot be verified, process the request as an opt-out of the sale or sharing of the consumer’s personal information, as provided for under Section 1798.120 and limited by Sections 1798.105, 1798.145, and 1798.146, within 45 days of receiving the request.

(C) Direct all service providers or contractors associated with the data broker to delete all personal information in their possession related to the consumers making the requests described in subparagraph (A).

(D) Direct all service providers or contractors associated with the data broker to process a request described by subparagraph (B) as an opt-out of the sale or sharing of the consumer’s personal information, as provided for under Section 1798.120 and limited by Sections 1798.105, 1798.145, and 1798.146.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a data broker shall not be required to delete a consumer’s personal information if either of the following apply:

(A) It is reasonably necessary for the data broker to maintain the personal information to fulfill a purpose described in subdivision (d) of Section 1798.105.

(B) The deletion is not required pursuant to Section 1798.145 or 1798.146.

(3) Personal information described in paragraph (2) shall only
 be used for the purposes described in paragraph (2) and shall not be used or disclosed for any other purpose, including, but not limited to, marketing purposes.

(d) (1) Beginning August 1, 2026, after a consumer has submitted a deletion request and a data broker has deleted the consumer’s data pursuant to this section, the data broker shall delete all personal information of the consumer at least once every 45 days pursuant to this section unless the consumer requests otherwise or the deletion is not required pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(2) Beginning August 1, 2026, after a consumer has submitted a deletion request and a data broker has deleted the consumer’s data pursuant to this section, the data broker shall not sell or share new personal information of the consumer unless the consumer requests otherwise or selling or sharing the personal
 information is permitted under Section 1798.145 or 1798.146.

(e) (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, and every three years thereafter, a data broker shall undergo an audit by an independent third party to determine compliance with this section.

(2) For an audit completed pursuant to paragraph (1), the data broker shall submit a report resulting from the audit and any related materials to the California Privacy Protection Agency within five business days of a written request from the California Privacy Protection Agency.

(3) A data broker shall maintain the report and materials described in paragraph (2) for at least six years.

(f) (1) The California Privacy Protection Agency may charge an access fee to a data
 broker when the data broker accesses the accessible deletion mechanism pursuant to subdivision (c) that does not exceed the reasonable costs of providing that access.

(2) A fee collected by the California Privacy Protection Agency pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deposited in the Data Brokers’ Registry Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 466, Sec. 3.   (SB 361)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.87.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the California Privacy Protection Agency may adopt regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement and administer this title.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any regulation adopted by the California Privacy Protection Agency to establish fees authorized by this title shall be exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 709, Sec. 7.   (SB 362)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.88.

Nothing in this title shall be construed to supersede or interfere with the operation of the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (Title 1.81.5 (commencing with Section 1798.100)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 753, Sec. 2.   (AB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1798.99.89.

No administrative action brought pursuant to this title alleging a violation of any of the provisions of this title shall be commenced more than five years after the date on which the violation occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 709, Sec. 8.   (SB 362)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  TITLE 1.81.49. Health and Location Data Privacy [1798.99.90. - 1798.99.93.]

1798.99.90.

For purposes of this title, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Collect,” “collected,” or “collection” means buying, renting, gathering, obtaining, receiving, or accessing any personal information pertaining to a natural person by any means. This includes receiving information from the natural person, either actively or passively, or by observing the natural person’s behavior.

(b) “Family planning center” means a facility categorized as a family planning center by the North American Industry Classification System adopted by the United States Census Bureau, including, but not limited to, a clinic or center that provides reproductive
 health care services as defined in Section 1798.300.

(c) “Geofence” means any technology that enables spatial or location detection to establish a virtual boundary around, and detect an individual’s presence within, a “precise geolocation” as defined in subdivision (w) of Section 1798.140.

(d) “Health care services” means any service provided to a natural person of a medical, surgical, psychiatric, therapeutic, diagnostic, mental health, behavioral health, preventative, rehabilitative, supportive, consultative, referral, or prescribing nature.

(e) “Person” means a natural person, association, proprietorship, corporation, trust, foundation, partnership, or any other organization or group of people acting in concert.

(f) “Personal information” has the same definition as that term is defined in subdivision (v) of Section 1798.140, except as applied to all natural persons and not limited to consumers and households, as those terms are defined in subdivisions (i) and (q), respectively, of that section.

(g) “Precise geolocation” means a geographic area that is equal to or less than the area of a circle with a radius of 1,850 feet as derived from a device that is used or intended to be used to locate a person. If the geographic scope of the term “precise geolocation” as defined in Section 1798.140 is expanded beyond 1,850 feet, then that larger scope shall apply to this definition of precise geolocation.

(h) “Research” means systematic
 investigation, including research development, testing, and evaluation, that has as its primary purpose the development of, or contribution to, generalizable knowledge.
